Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6533
Qualified employee, defined.

Qualified employee means a person employed by the taxpayer who is (1) a full-time employee, (2) exclusively dedicated to supporting military defense efforts in this state, (3) paid wages at a rate equal to at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage, and (4) employed in a position in which no one was employed within this state prior to July 1, 2025.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 10.
July 1, 2027